Missouri, session 2026, SB1079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 135.750, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 135.750,
3 to read as follows:
1 135.750. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2 referred to as the "Show MO Act".
3 2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
4 (1) "Above-the-line individual", any individual hired
5 or credited on screen for a qualified motion media
6 production project as any type of producer, principal cast
7 that is at a Screen Actors Guild Schedule F and above
8 payment rate, screenwriter, and the director;
9 (2) "Qualified motion media production project", any
10 film or series production, including videos, commercials,
11 video games, webisodes, music videos, content-based mobile
12 applications, virtual reality, augmented reality, multi-
13 media, and new media, as well as standalone visual effects
14 and postproduction for such motion media production project,
15 as approved by the department of economic development and
16 the office of the Missouri film commission, that features a
17 statement and logo designated by the department of economic
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1079 2
18 development in the credits of the completed production
19 indicating that the project was filmed in Missouri and that
20 is under thirty minutes in length with expected qualifying
21 expenses in excess of fifty thousand dollars or is over
22 thirty minutes in length with expected qualifying expenses
23 in excess of one hundred thousand dollars. Regardless of
24 the production costs, qualified motion media project shall
25 not include any:
26 (a) News or current events programming;
27 (b) Talk show;
28 (c) Production produced primarily for industrial,
29 corporate, or institutional purposes, and for internal use;
30 (d) Sports event or sports program;
31 (e) Gala presentation or awards show;
32 (f) Infomercial or any production that directly
33 solicits funds;
34 (g) Political ad;
35 (h) Production that is considered obscene, as defined
36 in section 573.010;
37 (3) "Qualifying expenses", the sum of the total amount
38 spent in this state for the following by a production
39 company in connection with a qualified motion media
40 production project:
41 (a) Goods and services leased or purchased by the
42 production company. For goods with a purchase price of
43 twenty-five thousand dollars or more, the amount included in
44 qualifying expenses shall be the purchase price less the
45 fair market value of the goods at the time the production is
46 completed;
47 (b) Compensation and wages paid by the production
48 company on which the production company remitted withholding
49 payments to the department of revenue under chapter 143.

SB 1079 3
50 For purposes of this section, compensation and wages paid to
51 all above-the-line individuals shall be limited to twenty-
52 five percent of the overall qualifying expenses;
53 (4) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
54 due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by
55 sections 143.191 to 143.265, or otherwise due under chapter
56 148;
57 (5) "Taxpayer", any individual, partnership, or
58 corporation as described in section 143.441, 143.471, or
59 section 148.370 that is subject to the tax imposed in
60 chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
61 143.191 to 143.265, or the tax imposed in chapter 148 or any
62 charitable organization which is exempt from federal income
63 tax and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if
64 any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
65 chapter 143.
66 3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
67 January 1, 2023, a taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit
68 equal to twenty percent of qualifying expenses.
69 (2) An additional five percent may be earned for
70 qualifying expenses if at least fifty percent of the
71 qualified motion media production project is filmed in
72 Missouri.
73 (3) An additional five percent may be earned for
74 qualifying expenses if at least fifteen percent of the
75 qualified motion media production project that is filmed in
76 Missouri takes place in a rural or blighted area in Missouri.
77 (4) An additional five percent may be earned for
78 qualifying expenses if at least three departments of the
79 qualified motion media production hire a Missouri resident
80 ready to advance to the next level in a specialized craft
81 position or learn a new skillset.

SB 1079 4
82 (5) An additional five percent may be earned for
83 qualifying expenses if the department of economic
84 development determines that the script of the qualified
85 motion media production project positively markets a city or
86 region of the state, the entire state, or a tourist
87 attraction located in the state, and the qualified motion
88 media production provides no less than five high resolution
89 photographs containing cast with the rights cleared for
90 promotional use by the Missouri film commission, accompanied
91 by a list with the title of production, location, names, and
92 titles of the individuals shown in the photography and
93 photographer credit.
94 (6) The total dollar amount of tax credits authorized
95 pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
96 increased by ten percent for qualified film production
97 projects located in a county of the second, third, or fourth
98 class.
99 (7) Activities qualifying a taxpayer for the tax
100 credit pursuant to this subsection shall be approved by the
101 office of the Missouri film commission and the department of
102 economic development.
103 4. A qualified motion media production project shall
104 not be eligible for tax credits pursuant to this section
105 unless such project employs at least the following number of
106 Missouri registered apprentices or veterans residing in
107 Missouri with transferable skills:
108 (1) If the qualifying expenses are less than five
109 million dollars, two;
110 (2) If the qualifying expenses are at least five
111 million dollars but less than ten million dollars, three;

SB 1079 5
112 (3) If the qualifying expenses are at least ten
113 million dollars but less than fifteen million dollars, six;
114 or
115 (4) If the qualifying expenses are at least fifteen
116 million dollars, eight.
117 5. Taxpayers shall apply for the motion media
118 production tax credit by submitting an application to the
119 department of economic development, on a form provided by
120 the department. As part of the application, the expected
121 qualifying expenses of the qualified motion media production
122 project shall be documented. In addition, the application
123 shall include an economic impact statement, showing the
124 economic impact from the activities of the qualified motion
125 media production project. Such economic impact statement
126 shall indicate the impact on the region of the state in
127 which the qualified motion media production or production-
128 related activities are located and on the state as a whole.
129 Final applications shall be accompanied by a report by a
130 certified public accountant licensed by the state of
131 Missouri, prepared at the expense of the applicant,
132 attesting that the amounts in the final application are
133 qualifying expenses.
134 6. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
135 January 1, 2023, and ending on or before December 31, 2026,
136 the total amount of tax credits authorized by this section
137 for film production shall not exceed a total of eight
138 million dollars per year, and the total amount of all tax
139 credits authorized by this section for series production
140 shall not exceed a total of eight million dollars per year.
141 Taxpayers may carry forward unused credits for up to five
142 tax periods, provided all such credits shall be claimed
143 within ten tax periods following the tax period in which the

SB 1079 6
144 qualified motion media production or production-related
145 activities for which the credits are certified by the
146 department occurred.
147 (2) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
148 2027, the total amount of tax credits authorized by this
149 section for film or series production shall not exceed a
150 total of sixteen million dollars per year. Taxpayers may
151 carry forward unused credits for up to five tax periods,
152 provided all such credits shall be claimed within ten tax
153 periods following the tax period in which the qualified
154 motion media production or production-related activities for
155 which the credits are certified by the department occurred.
156 7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
157 contrary, any taxpayer may sell, assign, exchange, convey or
158 otherwise transfer tax credits allowed in subsection 3 of
159 this section. The taxpayer acquiring the tax credits may
160 use the acquired credits to offset the tax liabilities
161 otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
162 imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or chapter 148.
163 Unused acquired credits may be carried forward for up to
164 five tax periods, provided all such credits shall be claimed
165 within ten tax periods following the tax period in which the
166 qualified motion media production or production-related
167 activities for which the credits are certified by the
168 department occurred.
169 8. The tax credit authorized by this section shall be
170 considered a business recruitment tax credit, as defined in
171 section 135.800, and shall be subject to the provisions of
172 sections 135.800 to 135.830.
173 9. The department of economic development may adopt
174 such rules, statements of policy, procedures, forms, and
175 guidelines as may be necessary to implement the provisions

SB 1079 7
176 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
177 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
178 the authority delegated in this section shall become
179 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
180 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
181 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
182 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
183 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
184 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
185 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
186 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
187 2023, shall be invalid and void.
188 10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
189 (1) The provisions of the program authorized under
190 this section shall automatically sunset on December 31,
191 [2029] 2035, unless reauthorized by an act of the general
192 assembly; and
193 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
194 authorized under this section shall automatically sunset on
195 December thirty-first, twelve years after the effective date
196 of the reauthorization of this section; and
197 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of
198 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
199 which the program authorized under this section is sunset;
200 and
201 (4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
202 construed to limit or in any way impair the department's
203 ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the
204 date the program authorized pursuant to this section
205 expires, or a taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.
206 11. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
207 10 of this section to the contrary, the provisions of this

SB 1079 8
208 section shall automatically terminate and expire one year
209 after the department of economic development determines that
210 all other state and local governments in the United States
211 of America have terminated or let lapse their tax credit or
212 other governmental incentive program for the film production
213 industry, regardless of whether such credits or programs are
214 now in effect or first commence after August 28, 2023. The
215 department of economic development shall notify the revisor
216 of statutes upon the department's determination that the tax
217 credit authorized by this section shall terminate pursuant
218 to this subsection.
219 (2) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
220 construed to limit or in any way impair the ability of any
221 taxpayer that has met the requirements in this section prior
222 to the termination of this section to participate in the
223 program authorized under this section. The provisions of
224 this section shall not be construed to limit or in any way
225 impair the department of revenue's ability to redeem tax
226 credits qualified for on or before the date the program
227 authorized pursuant to this section expires.
✓